Hawaii statutes.
§806-42 Second offense. In any
indictment for any offense committed after a previous conviction or convictions
for any felony or misdemeanor, it shall be sufficient after charging the
subsequent offense to state that the offender was at a certain time and place,
or at certain times and places, convicted of felony or misdemeanor, and to
state the substance and effect only, omitting the formal part of the indictment
and conviction for the previous offense, without otherwise describing the
previous offense or offenses. [L 1876, c 40, §20; RL 1925, §4065; RL 1935,
§5516; RL 1945, §10818; RL 1955, §258-28; HRS §711-42; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next